North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-12 Township Overseer of Highways

58-12-01.
Township overseer of highways — Appointment.

The board of township supervisors, at its meeting on the fourth Tuesday in March, shall appoint one township overseer of highways who must be a practical roadbuilder.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 92, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1990m; S.L. 1915, ch. 260, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1990m; R.C. 1943, § 58-1201.

Cross-References.

Oath, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-01-05, 58-05-07.

58-12-02.
Compensation of overseer.

The compensation of the overseer must be fixed by the board of township supervisors and must be paid on the presentation of a proper claim at the meeting of the board on the last Tuesday in October.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 92, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1990m; S.L. 1915, ch. 260, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1990m; R.C. 1943, § 58-1202.

58-12-03.
Duties of the overseer.

The township overseer of highways shall:

Have direct charge of the construction and maintenance of all township highways and bridges, whether the work done is by contract or day labor.

Be responsible for the maintenance of the township highways throughout the entire year.

Repealed by S.L. 1951, ch. 178, § 5.

Execute all lawful orders of the board of township supervisors.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 2, § 6; R.C. 1895, § 1116; R.C. 1899, § 1116; R.C. 1905, § 1410; S.L. 1907, ch. 253, § 1; 1913, ch. 92, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 1985, 1990m; S.L. 1915, ch. 260, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1990m; R.C. 1943, § 58-1203; S.L. 1951, ch. 178, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 58-1203.

Cross-References.

Duty when carcass of dead animal found, see N.D.C.C. § 36-14-20.

Filling mines, see N.D.C.C. § 23-13-08.

Filling wells on state and school lands, see N.D.C.C. § 23-13-07.

Removing obstructions in highways, see N.D.C.C. § 24-06-31.

58-12-04.
Assistant overseers of highways.

Upon the recommendation of the overseer, the board of township supervisors may appoint one or more assistant overseers of highways. An assistant overseer shall work under the direction of the overseer and the board of township supervisors.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 92, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 1990m; S.L. 1915, ch. 260, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1990m; R.C. 1943, § 58-1204.

58-12-05.
Township overseer of highways ex officio deputy county superintendent of highways.

In counties having a county superintendent of highways, the township overseer of highways is ex officio deputy county superintendent of highways for that township.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 92, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 1990n; R.C. 1943, § 58-1205.

58-12-06.
Overseer prohibited from taking contract work — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

58-12-07.
Penalty for neglect to perform duties.

Every overseer who refuses or neglects to perform any of the duties which are required of the overseer shall forfeit the sum of ten dollars for each such refusal or neglect which is recoverable in a civil action brought by the township and which must be used in making and improving the township roads.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 2, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 1119; R.C. 1899, § 1119; R.C. 1905, § 1419; C.L. 1913, § 2003; R.C. 1943, § 58-1207.